District of Columbia statutes.
45-605

“Executor” to include “administrator”.

Wherever the word “executor” is used it shall include “administrator,” and vice versa, unless such application of the term would be unreasonable.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1189, ch. 854

History

Acts and resolutions of Council, rules of construction, see § 1-301.45 et seq.

Cross References

1981 Ed., § 49-205.
1973 Ed., § 49-205.

Prior Codifications